Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [268B.40] PRENATAL AND NEWBORN BENEFITS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (c) "Health care provider" means: new text end new text begin (1) an individual who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under law to practice in Minnesota in the individual's scope of practice as a: new text end new text begin (i) physician; new text end new text begin (ii) physician assistant; new text end new text begin (iii) osteopath; new text end new text begin (iv) advanced practice registered nurse; new text end new text begin (v) certified professional midwife; or new text end new text begin (vi) birth doula; or new text end new text begin (2) any other individual determined by the commissioner to be capable of providing the documentation required. new text end new text begin (d) "Newborn" means a child no more than six months of age. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner must create a program to provide both prenatal financial support and monthly payments to families with newborns. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin General eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for program benefits, the applicant must be: new text end new text begin (1) a Minnesota resident; and new text end new text begin (2) applying for benefits based on their legal relationship to a newborn who was born on or after January 1, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Eligibility for benefits under this program is not subject to any income or asset test. new text end new text begin (c) Eligibility for benefits under this program is not conditioned on employment status. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Prenatal financial support. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant may apply for a onetime prenatal benefit of $1,500 no earlier than 90 days before the child's estimated or actual: new text end new text begin (1) due date; new text end new text begin (2) date of adoption; or new text end new text begin (3) date of placement with a legal guardian. new text end new text begin (b) An application for prenatal financial support must be supported by documentation of: new text end new text begin (1) the child's actual or pending birth; and new text end new text begin (2) the applicant's actual or pending legal relationship to the child as the child's biological parent, adoptive parent, or legal guardian. new text end new text begin (c) Documentation in support of an application for prenatal financial support may be provided by: new text end new text begin (1) a health care provider; new text end new text begin (2) an adoption or foster care agency involved in the placement; or new text end new text begin (3) another individual or entity approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) More than one parent or guardian may be listed on an application, but only one prenatal benefit payment may be issued per child. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Newborn financial support. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant may apply for a newborn financial support benefit of $750 a month for 24 consecutive months no earlier than the child's: new text end new text begin (1) date of birth; new text end new text begin (2) date of adoption; or new text end new text begin (3) date of placement with a legal guardian. new text end new text begin (b) An application for newborn financial support must be supported by documentation of: new text end new text begin (1) the child's birth; and new text end new text begin (2) the applicant's legal relation to the newborn as the child's biological parent, adoptive parent, or legal guardian. new text end new text begin (c) Documentation in support of an application for newborn financial support may be provided in the form of: new text end new text begin (1) a birth certificate; new text end new text begin (2) a verification of birth form and corresponding vital records; new text end new text begin (3) a legal record of the adoption; or new text end new text begin (4) official documentation of the foster placement. new text end new text begin (d) More than one parent or guardian may be listed on an application, but only one monthly newborn benefit payment may be issued per newborn. new text end new text begin (e) An applicant is ineligible for the benefit under this subdivision for any month where the applicant and newborn are not residents of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Application process. new text end new text begin An applicant must apply for prenatal and newborn benefits using a process developed by the commissioner. This process must allow an applicant the option to apply online, by mail, or in person. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Change in status. new text end new text begin An applicant must notify the commissioner in writing of any change in the applicant's status as a parent or legal guardian while an application is pending or while the applicant is receiving benefits. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Cost of living adjustment. new text end new text begin Beginning on July 1, 2030, and by July 1 of every even-numbered year, the commissioner must review and apply an annual cost-of-living adjustment to the amount of both prenatal and newborn benefit payments. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Effect on other benefits. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, cash payments under this section must not be considered income, assets, or personal property for purposes of determining eligibility or recertifying eligibility for: new text end new text begin (1) child care assistance programs under chapter 142E; new text end new text begin (2) food support under chapter 142F; new text end new text begin (3) the Minnesota family investment program and diversionary work program under chapter 142G; new text end new text begin (4) general assistance and Minnesota supplemental aid under chapter 256D; new text end new text begin (5) housing support under chapter 256I; and new text end new text begin (6) economic assistance programs under chapter 256P. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not consider cash payments under this section as income or assets for medical assistance under section 256B.056, subdivision 1a, paragraph (a); 3; or 3c. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The commissioner may adopt rules for the administration of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Outreach. new text end new text begin The commissioner must conduct public outreach in partnership with health care providers, local public health agencies, community-based organizations, and Tribal governments to inform families of the availability of benefits under this program. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Evaluation and reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning on February 1, 2029, the commissioner must report to the legislature by February 1 of each odd-numbered year on program participation, expenditures, and outcomes, including any recommendations for changes to benefit levels, duration, or administration. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may contract with an independent research organization or academic institution to evaluate program impacts on the well-being of children and families. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PRENATAL AND NEWBORN BENEFITS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for prenatal and newborn benefits under Minnesota Statutes, section 268B.40. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) up to $....... may be used for program administration; new text end new text begin (2) up to $....... may be used for program outreach; and new text end new text begin (3) up to $....... may be used for program evaluation and reporting. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end